North Carolina, session 2025, HB434.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. UPDATES TO HEALTH INSURANCE UTILIZATION REVIEW
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 58-50-61 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-50-61. Utilization review.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, in G.S. 58-50-62, and in Part 4 of this Article,
the term:The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) "Certificate of coverage" includes a Certificate of coverage. – A policy of
insurance issued to an individual person or a franchise policy issued pursuant
to G.S. 58-51-90.
(1a) Chronic or long-term condition. – A condition that has an expected duration
of one year or more and that (i) requires ongoing medical attention, (ii) limits
activities of daily living, or (iii) both.
(1b) "Clinical peer" means a health care Clinical peer. – A healthcare professional
who holds an unrestricted license in a state of the United States, in the same
or similar specialty, specialty as those subject to utilization review and who
also routinely provides the health care healthcare services subject to utilization
review.
(2) "Clinical Clinical review criteria" means the criteria. – The written screening
procedures, decision abstracts, clinical protocols, and practice guidelines used
by an insurer to determine medically necessary services and supplies.
(2a) Closely related service. – A healthcare service subject to utilization review
that is closely related in purpose, diagnostic utility, or designated healthcare
billing code; that was provided on the same date of service as another
healthcare service that was authorized to be performed by a previous
utilization review determination; and for which a provider, acting within the
scope of the provider's license and expertise, may reasonably be expected to
perform in conjunction with, or in lieu of, the originally authorized service
due to differences in the observed patient characteristics or needs for
diagnostic information that were not readily identifiable until the provider was
performing the originally authorized service. The term does not include an
*H434-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
order for, or administration of, a prescription drug or any part of a series or
course of treatments.
(2b) Course of treatment. – Any prescribed order or all ordered treatments,
including all prescription drugs and medical therapies, for a specific covered
person with a specific condition that is outlined and decided upon ahead of
time with the covered person and healthcare provider.
(3) "Covered person" means a Covered person. – A policyholder, subscriber,
enrollee, or other individual covered by a health benefit plan. "Covered
person" This term includes another person, other than the covered person's
provider, who is authorized to act on behalf of a covered person.
(4) "Emergency Emergency medical condition" means a condition. – A medical
condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity
including, but not limited to, severe pain, or by acute symptoms developing
from a chronic medical condition that would lead a prudent layperson,
possessing an average knowledge of health and medicine, to reasonably
expect the absence of immediate medical attention to result in any of the
following:
…
(5) "Emergency services" means health care Emergency services. – Healthcare
items and services furnished or required to screen for or treat an emergency
medical condition until the condition is stabilized, including prehospital care
transportation services, including ambulance services and ancillary services
routinely available to the emergency department.
(6) "Grievance" means a Grievance. – A written complaint submitted by a
covered person about any of the following:
a. An insurer's decisions, policies, or actions related to availability,
delivery, or quality of health care healthcare services. A written
complaint submitted by a covered person about a decision rendered
solely on the basis that the health benefit plan contains a benefits
exclusion for the health care service in question is not a grievance if
the exclusion of the specific service requested is clearly stated in the
certificate of coverage.
b. Claims payment or handling; handling or the reimbursement for
services.
…
(8) "Health care provider" means any Healthcare provider. – Any person who is
licensed, registered, or certified under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or
the laws of another state to provide health care healthcare services in the
ordinary care of business or practice or a profession business, practice, or
profession, or in an approved education or training program; in a health care
facility facility, as defined in G.S. 131E-176(9b) or the laws of another state
to operate as a health care facility; or in a pharmacy.
(9) "Health care services" means services Healthcare services. – Services
provided for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a health
condition, illness, injury, or disease.
(10) "Insurer" means an Insurer. – An entity that writes a health benefit plan and
that is an insurance company subject to this Chapter, a service corporation
under Article 65 of this Chapter, a health maintenance organization under
Article 67 of this Chapter, or a multiple employer welfare arrangement under
Article 50A of this Chapter.
Page 2 House Bill 434-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) "Managed care plan" means a Managed care plan. – A health benefit plan in
which an insurer either (i) requires a covered person to use or (ii) creates
incentives, including financial incentives, for a covered person to use
providers that are under contract with or managed, owned, or employed by the
insurer.
(12) "Medically Medically necessary services or supplies" means those supplies. –
Those covered services or supplies that are:meet any of the following criteria:
a. Provided Are provided for the diagnosis, treatment, cure, or relief of a
health condition, illness, injury, or disease.
b. Except as allowed under G.S. 58-3-255, are not for experimental,
investigational, or cosmetic purposes.
c. Necessary Are necessary for and appropriate to the diagnosis,
treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, illness, injury, disease,
or its symptoms.
d. Within Provision of the services or supplies is within generally
accepted standards of medical care in the community.
e. Not Are not provided solely for the convenience of the insured, the
insured's family, or the provider.
…
(13) "Noncertification" means a Noncertification. – A determination by an insurer
or its designated utilization review organization that an admission, availability
of care, continued stay, or other health care healthcare service has been
reviewed and, based upon the information provided, does not meet the
insurer's requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care
healthcare setting, level of care care, or effectiveness, or does not meet the
prudent layperson standard for coverage of emergency services in
G.S. 58-3-190, and the requested service is therefore denied, reduced, or
terminated. A "noncertification" noncertification is not a decision rendered
solely on the basis that the health benefit plan does not provide benefits for
the health care healthcare service in question, if the exclusion of the specific
service requested is clearly stated in the certificate of coverage. A
"noncertification" noncertification includes any situation in which an insurer
or its designated agent makes a decision about a covered person's condition to
determine whether a requested treatment is experimental, investigational, or
cosmetic, and the extent of coverage under the health benefit plan is affected
by that decision.
(14) "Participating provider" means a Participating provider. – A provider who,
under a contract with an insurer or with an insurer's contractor or
subcontractor, has agreed to provide health care healthcare services to covered
persons in return for direct or indirect payment from the insurer, other than
cost-sharing by the covered person, such as coinsurance, copayments, or
deductibles.
(14a) Prior authorization. – The process by which insurers and utilization review
organizations determine the medical necessity or medical appropriateness of
otherwise covered healthcare services prior to the rendering of those
healthcare services. Prior authorization includes any insurer's or utilization
review organization's requirement that a covered person or healthcare
provider notify the insurer or utilization review organization prior to providing
a healthcare service.
(15) "Provider" means a health care Provider. – A healthcare provider.
House Bill 434-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(16) "Stabilize" means to Stabilize. – To provide medical care that is appropriate
to prevent a material deterioration of the person's condition, within reasonable
medical probability, in accordance with the HCFA (Health Care Financing
Administration) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services interpretative
guidelines, policies, and regulations pertaining to responsibilities of hospitals
in emergency cases (as provided cases under the Emergency Medical
Treatment and Labor Act, section 1867 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.S.
§ 1395dd), 42 U.S.C.S. § 1395dd, and including any medically necessary
services and supplies to maintain stabilization until the person is transferred.
(16a) Urgent healthcare service. – A healthcare service with respect to which the
application of the time periods for making a non-expedited utilization review
that, in the opinion of a medical doctor with knowledge of the covered person's
medical condition, could either (i) seriously jeopardize the life or health of the
covered person or the ability of the covered person to regain maximum
function or (ii) subject the covered person to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without the care or treatment that is the subject of the
utilization review. The term urgent healthcare service includes mental and
behavioral healthcare services.
(17) "Utilization review" means a Utilization review. – A set of formal techniques
designed to monitor the use of or evaluate the clinical necessity,
appropriateness, efficacy efficacy, or efficiency of health care healthcare
services, procedures, providers, or facilities. These techniques may
include:include any of the following:
…
c. Certification. – A determination by an insurer or its designated URO
that an admission, availability of care, continued stay, or other service
has been reviewed and, based on the information provided, satisfies
the insurer's requirements for medically necessary services and
supplies, appropriateness, health care healthcare setting, level of care,
and effectiveness.
d. Concurrent review. – Utilization review conducted during a patient's
hospital stay or course of treatment.treatment and for which payment
will be made for that service.
…
e1. Prior authorization.
…
(18) "Utilization Utilization review organization" or "URO" means an organization
or URO. – An entity that conducts utilization review under a managed care
plan, but does not mean an insurer performing utilization review for its own
health benefit plan.
…
(c) Scope and Content of Program. – Every insurer shall prepare and maintain a
utilization review program document that describes all delegated and nondelegated review
functions for covered services including:including all of the following:
(1) Procedures to evaluate the clinical necessity, appropriateness, efficacy, or
efficiency of health healthcare services.
…
(5) Data collection processes and analytical methods used in assessing utilization
of health care healthcare services.
…
Page 4 House Bill 434-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) The organizational structure (e.g., structure, such as a utilization review
committee, quality assurance, or other committee) committees, that
periodically assesses utilization review activities and reports to the insurer's
governing body.
…
(9) The methods of collection and assessment of data about underutilization and
overutilization of health care healthcare services and how the assessment is
used to evaluate and improve procedures and criteria for utilization review.
(d) Program Operations. Clinical Review Criteria, Generally. – In every utilization
review program, an insurer or URO shall use documented clinical review criteria that are based
on sound clinical evidence and that are periodically evaluated at least annually to assure ongoing
efficacy. An insurer may develop its own clinical review criteria or purchase or license clinical
review criteria. criteria, provided that the clinical review meets, at a minimum, all of the
following standards:
(1) The criteria used is based on applicable nationally recognized medical
standards.
(2) The clinical review and standards used are consistent with applicable
government guidelines.
(3) The clinical review provides for the delivery of a healthcare service in a
clinically appropriate type, frequency, and setting and for a clinically
appropriate duration.
(4) The criteria used in the clinical review reflects the current medical and
scientific evidence regarding emerging procedures, clinical guidelines, and
best practices, as articulated in independent, peer-reviewed medical literature.
(5) The clinical review is sufficiently flexible to allow deviations from the norm
when justified on a case-by-case basis to ensure access to care.
(d1) Clinical Review Criteria, Substance Use Treatment. – Criteria for determining when
a patient needs to be placed in a substance abuse treatment program shall be either (i) the
diagnostic criteria contained in the most recent revision of the American Society of Addiction
Medicine Patient Placement Criteria for the Treatment of Substance-Related Disorders or (ii)
criteria adopted by the insurer or its URO. Disorders. The Department, in consultation with the
Department of Health and Human Services, may require proof of compliance with this subsection
by a plan or URO.
(d2) Administration of Program. – All of the following shall apply in the administration of
a utilization review program under this section:
(1) Qualified health care professionals shall administer the utilization review
program and oversee review decisions under the direction of a medical doctor.
A medical doctor licensed to practice medicine in this State shall evaluate the
clinical appropriateness of noncertifications. An insurer and its URO shall
ensure that all noncertifications are made by a medical doctor possessing a
current and valid license to practice medicine in this State who (i) is of the
same specialty as the healthcare provider who typically manages the medical
condition or disease or provides the healthcare service involved in the request
and (ii) has experience treating patients with the condition or disease for which
the healthcare service is being requested. Medical doctors shall issue
noncertifications under the clinical direction of one of the insurer's medical
directors responsible for the provision of healthcare services provided to
covered persons.
(2) Compensation to persons involved in utilization review shall not contain any
direct or indirect incentives for them to make any particular review decisions.
House Bill 434-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Compensation to utilization reviewers shall not be directly or indirectly based
on the number or type of noncertifications they render.
(4) In issuing a utilization review decision, an insurer shall: obtain or its URO
shall do all of the following:
a. Obtain all information required to make the decision, including
pertinent clinical information; employ information.
b. Employ a process to ensure that utilization reviewers apply clinical
review criteria consistently; and issue consistently.
c. Apply the decision in a timely manner pursuant to this section.
(d3) Consultation Prior to Issuing Noncertifications. – If an insurer or its URO is
questioning the medical necessity of a healthcare service, then the covered person's relevant
provider shall be notified that medical necessity is being questioned within five business days of
the date the insurer or its URO received the utilization review request for the healthcare service
in question. Prior to issuing a noncertification, the covered person's provider shall be given the
opportunity to discuss the medical necessity of the healthcare service by telephonic or tele-video
means with the medical doctor who will be responsible for making the utilization review
determination of the healthcare service under review. The insurer or its URO is required to make
documented personal contact with the covered person's provider, or with the medical staff of that
provider, via telephone before the five business days otherwise required under this section for
notification.
(e) Insurer Responsibilities. – Every insurer shall:shall do all of the following regarding
its utilization review process under this section:
…
(7) Maintain a complete, publicly available list of healthcare services for which
utilization review is required, including for all healthcare services where
utilization review is to be performed by an entity under contract with the
insurer.
(8) Ensure that its URO is in compliance with this section.
(f) Time Lines for Prospective and Concurrent Utilization Reviews Based Upon Type of
Healthcare Service. – As used in this subsection, the term "necessary information" includes the
results of any patient examination, clinical evaluation, or second opinion that may be required.
Prospective and concurrent determinations shall be communicated to the covered person's
provider within three business days after the insurer obtains all necessary information about the
admission, procedure, or health care service. The time line for completion of a prospective or
current utilization review is as follows:
(1) Non-urgent healthcare services. – An insurer or its URO shall both render a
utilization review determination or noncertification concerning non-urgent
healthcare services and notify the covered person and the covered person's
provider of that determination or noncertification within 48 hours of obtaining
all necessary information to make the utilization review determination or
noncertification.
(2) Urgent healthcare services. – An insurer or its URO shall both render a
utilization review determination or noncertification concerning urgent
healthcare services and notify the covered person and the covered person's
provider of that determination or noncertification not later than 24 hours after
receiving all necessary information needed to complete the review of the
requested healthcare services.
(3) Emergency services. – All of the following shall apply to utilization review
for emergency services:
a. Utilization review shall not be required for prehospital transportation
or the provision of emergency services.
Page 6 House Bill 434-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. A minimum period of 24 hours following the provision of emergency
services to or an emergency admission of a covered person shall be
allowed for a covered person or the relevant provider to notify an
insurer or its URO of the admission or provision of emergency
services. If the admission or emergency service occurs on a State or
federal holiday or on a weekend, then notification shall not be required
until the next business day after the admission or provision of the
emergency services.
c. An insurer shall cover emergency services necessary to screen and
stabilize a covered person. If a provider attests in writing to an insurer
within 72 hours of a covered person's admission that the covered
person's condition required emergency services, then that attestation
creates a presumption that the emergency services were medically
necessary and that presumption may be rebutted only if the insurer is
able to establish, with clear and convincing evidence, that the
emergency services were not medically necessary.
d. The medical necessity or appropriateness of emergency services shall
not be based on whether those services were provided by participating
or nonparticipating providers. Restrictions on coverage of emergency
services provided by nonparticipating providers cannot be greater than
restrictions that apply when those same services are provided by
participating providers.
e. If a covered person receives an emergency service that requires one or
more immediate post-evaluation or post-stabilization services, then an
insurer or its URO shall make a utilization review determination for
those services within 60 minutes of receiving a request. If the
authorization determination is not made within 60 minutes, then the
services for which the utilization review was requested are deemed
approved.
(f1) Utilization Review Requests for Additional Information. – If an insurer or its URO
requests additional information to process a claim subject to utilization review, then an insurer
shall notify the provider of the specific information necessary to complete the utilization review
and the specific purpose of the request. The notification shall reference all relevant clinical and
administrative criteria and be written in easily understandable language. The notification shall be
sent to the provider as soon as possible but not later than 48 hours after receipt of the initial
utilization review request. The requesting provider or a member of the requesting provider's
clinical or administrative staff may submit the specified additional information within 14 business
days of the notification that clinical information is missing. Any claim subject to a request for
additional information shall be processed within the time periods for prompt payment of claims
pursuant to G.S. 58-3-225.
(f2) Utilization Review Determination Notifications. – If an insurer certifies a health care
healthcare service, the insurer shall notify notification shall be sent to the covered person's
provider. For If an insurer issues a noncertification, the insurer shall notify the covered person's
provider and send then written or electronic confirmation of the noncertification shall be sent to
the covered person's provider and covered person. In person that is in compliance with subsection
(h) of this section.
(f3) Concurrent Review Liability. – For concurrent reviews, the insurer shall remain liable
for health care healthcare services until the covered person has been notified of the
noncertification.
(g) Retrospective Reviews. – As used in this subsection, the term "necessary information"
includes the results of any patient examination, clinical evaluation, or second opinion that may
House Bill 434-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
be required. For retrospective review determinations, an insurer or its URO shall make the
determination within 30 days after receiving all necessary information. For a certification, the
insurer may give written notification to the covered person's provider. For a noncertification, If
a noncertification is issued, then the insurer or its URO shall give written notification to the
covered person and the covered person's provider within five business days after making issuing
the noncertification. The notice of the noncertification shall meet all requirements under
subsection (h) of this section.
(g1) Retrospective Denial. – Subject to subsection (n1) of this section, an insurer may not
revoke, limit, condition, or restrict a utilization review determination if care that has been
previously certified by the insurer or its URO is provided within 45 business days from the date
the provider received the utilization review determination. An insurer is required to pay a
provider at the contracted payment rate for a healthcare service provided by the provider per a
utilization review determination unless any of the following apply:
(1) The provider knowingly and materially misrepresented the healthcare service
in the utilization review request with the specific intent to deceive and obtain
an unlawful payment from the insurer.
(2) The healthcare service was no longer a covered benefit on the day it was
provided.
(3) The provider was no longer contracted with the covered person's health benefit
plan on the date the care was provided.
(4) The provider failed to meet the insurer's timely filing requirements.
(5) The insurer does not have liability for the claim.
(6) The covered person was no longer eligible for healthcare coverage on the day
the care was provided.
(h) Requirements for Notice of Noncertification. – A written notification of a
noncertification made in accordance with this section shall include all reasons for the
noncertification, including the clinical rationale, the name and medical specialty of all medical
doctors that were involved in the noncertification, the instructions for initiating a voluntary appeal
or reconsideration of the noncertification, and the instructions for requesting a written statement
of the clinical review criteria used to make the noncertification. An insurer shall provide the
clinical review criteria used to make the noncertification to any person who received the
notification of the noncertification and who follows the procedures for a request. An insurer shall
also inform the covered person in writing about the availability of assistance from the
Department's Health Insurance Smart NC, including the telephone number and address of the
Program.program.
(h1) Failure to Make a Timely Utilization Review Determination. – An insurer or its URO
failing to approve, deny, or request additional information for a requested utilization review
within the applicable time frames under this section is deemed to have approved the request.
(i) Requests for Informal Reconsideration. – An insurer may establish procedures for
informal reconsideration of noncertifications and, if established, the procedures shall be in
writing. After a written notice of noncertification has been issued in accordance with subsection
(h) of this section, the reconsideration shall be conducted between the covered person's provider
and a medical doctor licensed to practice medicine in this State designated by the insurer. An
insurer shall not require a covered person to participate in an informal reconsideration before the
covered person may appeal a noncertification under subsection (j) of this section. If, after
informal reconsideration, the insurer upholds the noncertification decision, then the insurer shall
issue a new notice in accordance with subsection (h) that meets the requirements of this section.
If the insurer is unable to render an informal reconsideration decision within 10 business days
after the date of receipt of the request for an informal reconsideration, it then the insurer shall
treat the request for informal reconsideration as a request for an appeal; provided that appeal and
the requirements of subsection (k) of this section for acknowledging the request shall apply
Page 8 House Bill 434-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
beginning on the day the insurer determines an informal reconsideration decision cannot be made
before the tenth business day after receipt of the request for an informal reconsideration.
(j) Appeals of Noncertifications. – Every insurer shall have written procedures for
appeals of noncertifications by covered persons or their providers acting on their behalves,
including expedited review to address a situation where the time frames for the standard review
procedures set forth in this section would reasonably appear to seriously jeopardize the life or
health of a covered person or jeopardize the covered person's ability to regain maximum function.
Each appeal shall be evaluated by a medical doctor licensed to practice medicine in this State
who was not involved in the noncertification.
(j1) Requirements Applicable to Appeals Reviews. – All appeals shall be reviewed by a
medical doctor who meets all of the following criteria:
(1) Possesses a current and valid non-restricted license to practice medicine in
this State.
(2) Is currently in active practice for a period of at least five consecutive years in
the same or similar specialty as a medical doctor who typically manages the
medical condition or disease for which utilization review is required.
(3) Is knowledgeable of, and has experience providing, the healthcare services
under appeal.
(4) Has not been directly involved in making the adverse determination.
As part of the appeals review, the medical doctor shall consider all known clinical aspects of
the healthcare service under review, including all pertinent medical records and any medical
literature that have been provided by the covered person's provider or by a health care facility.
(k) Nonexpedited Appeals. – Within three business days after receiving a request for a
standard, nonexpedited appeal, the insurer or its URO shall provide the covered person with the
name, address, and telephone number of the coordinator and information on how to submit
written material. For standard, nonexpedited appeals, the insurer or its URO shall give written
notification of the decision, in clear terms, to the covered person and the covered person's
provider within 30 days after the insurer receives the request for an appeal. If the decision is not
in favor of the covered person, then the written decision shall contain:contain all of the following
information:
(1) The professional qualifications and licensure of the person or persons
reviewing the appeal.
(2) A statement of the reviewers' understanding of the reason for the covered
person's appeal.
(3) The reviewers' decision in clear terms and the medical rationale in sufficient
detail for the covered person to respond further to the insurer's position.
(4) A reference to the evidence or documentation that is the basis for the decision,
including the clinical review criteria used to make the determination, and
instructions for requesting the clinical review criteria.
(5) A statement advising the covered person of the covered person's right to
request a second-level grievance review and a description of the procedure for
submitting a second-level grievance under G.S. 58-50-62.
(6) Notice of the availability of assistance from the Department's Health
Insurance Smart NC, including the telephone number and address of the
Program.program.
(l) Expedited Appeals. – An expedited appeal of a noncertification may be requested by
a covered person or his or her the provider acting on the covered person's behalf only when a
nonexpedited appeal would reasonably appear to seriously jeopardize the life or health of a
covered person or jeopardize the covered person's ability to regain maximum function. The
insurer may require documentation of the medical justification for the expedited appeal. The
insurer shall, in consultation with a medical doctor licensed to practice medicine in this State,
House Bill 434-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provide expedited review, and the insurer or its URO shall communicate its decision in writing
to the covered person and his or her provider as soon as possible, but not later than four days
after receiving the information justifying expedited review. The written decision shall contain
the provisions specified in subsection (k) of this section. If the expedited review is a concurrent
review determination, then the insurer shall remain liable for the coverage of health care
healthcare services until the covered person has been notified of the determination. An insurer is
not required to provide an expedited review for retrospective noncertifications.
(m) Disclosure of Utilization Review Requirements. – Information required to be
provided under this section shall be described in detail and in easily understandable language.
All of the following apply to an insurer's responsibility to disclose any utilization review
procedures:
(1) Coverage and member handbook. – In the certificate of coverage and member
handbook provided to covered persons, an insurer shall include a clear and
comprehensive description of its utilization review procedures, including the
procedures for appealing noncertifications and a statement of the rights and
responsibilities of covered persons, including the voluntary nature of the
appeal process, with respect to those procedures. An insurer shall also include
in the certificate of coverage and the member handbook information about the
availability of assistance from the Department's Health Insurance Smart NC,
including the telephone number and address of the Program. program.
(2) Prospective materials. – An insurer shall include a summary of its utilization
review procedures in materials intended for prospective covered persons.
(3) Membership cards. – An insurer shall print on its membership cards a toll-free
telephone number to call for utilization review purposes.
(4) Website. – An insurer shall make any current utilization review requirements
and restrictions readily accessible on its website.
(m1) Changes to Utilization Review. – If an insurer intends either to implement a new
utilization review requirement or restriction or to amend an existing requirement or restriction,
then all of the following apply:
(1) The new or amended requirement or restriction shall not be in effect unless
and until the insurer's website has been updated to reflect the new or amended
requirement or restriction. A claim shall not be denied for failure to obtain a
prior authorization if the new or amended requirement or restriction was not
in effect on the date of service of the claim.
(2) The insurer shall provide participating providers written notice of the new or
amended requirement or restriction no less than 60 calendar days before the
requirement or restriction is implemented.
This subsection does not apply if an insurer removes a utilization review requirement or
restriction or amends a requirement or restriction to be less restrictive.
(n) Maintenance of Records. – Every insurer and URO shall maintain records of each
review performed and each appeal received or reviewed, as well as documentation sufficient to
demonstrate compliance with this section. The maintenance of these records, including electronic
reproduction and storage, shall be governed by rules adopted by the Commissioner that apply to
insurers. These records shall be retained by the insurer and URO for a period of five years or, for
domestic companies, until the Commissioner has adopted a final report of a general examination
that contains a review of these records for that calendar year, whichever is later.
(n1) Utilization Review Statistics. – An insurer using utilization review shall make
statistics available regarding utilization review approvals and noncertifications on its website in
a readily accessible format and shall update the information available, at a minimum, on a
monthly basis. These statistics shall include the most recent 12-month rolling data reported
separately for medications and procedural codes for all of the following:
Page 10 House Bill 434-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The total number of medications and procedural codes subject to utilization
review, and specifically prior authorization.
(2) The percentage of medications and procedural codes requiring prior
authorization.
(3) The reasons for any noncertifications issued.
(4) The number and percentage of utilization review determinations that are
appealed and the number and percentage of appeals that are approved or
denied at each stage of the appeal process.
(5) The average time and distribution by percentile of number of days between
submission and response of each stage of the appeal process.
(6) The number and percentage of providers who qualify for an exemption from
the utilization review process under this section.
(n2) Utilization Review Determination Validity. – A utilization review determination shall
be valid for the entire duration of the approved course of treatment and shall be effective
regardless of any changes in dosage for a prescription drug prescribed by a provider. If an insurer
requires a utilization review determination for a healthcare service for the treatment of a chronic
or long-term care condition, then the utilization review determination shall remain valid for the
length of the treatment and the insurer may not require the covered person to obtain a utilization
review determination again for the healthcare service.
(o) Violation. – A violation of this section subjects an insurer to G.S. 58-2-70.
(p) Continuity of Care. – The following requirements shall apply to ensure continuity of
care for covered persons:
(1) On receipt from a covered person or the covered person's provider of
information documenting a prior utilization review determination, an insurer
shall honor a utilization review determination granted to the covered person
from a previous insurer for at least 90 calendar days of a covered person's
coverage under a new health benefit plan. During this 90-day time period, an
insurer may perform its own utilization review.
(2) If the insurer makes a change in coverage of, or approval criteria for, a
previously authorized healthcare service, then the change in coverage or
approval criteria shall not affect a covered person who received a utilization
review determination before the effective date of the change for the remainder
of that covered person's health benefit plan year.
(3) An insurer shall continue to honor a utilization review determination that the
insurer or its URO certified for a covered person when that covered person
changes products or health benefit plans under the same insurer, provided that
the medically necessary services or supplies subject to the utilization review
determination do not change.
(4) If a provider performs a healthcare service that is closely related to the service
for which certification has already been granted by an insurer or its URO, then
that insurer or its URO shall not deny a claim for the closely related service
for failure of the provider to seek or obtain a utilization review so long as the
provider had notified the insurer or its URO of the performance of the closely
related service both no later than three business days following the completion
of the closely related service and prior to the submission of a claim for
payment for that service. The submission of the notification shall include the
submission of all relevant clinical information necessary for the insurer to
evaluate the medical necessity of the service. Nothing in this subsection shall
be construed to limit an insurer's retrospective review of medical necessity of
the closely related service nor limit the need for verification of the covered
person's eligibility for coverage under the health benefit plan.
House Bill 434-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) An insurer shall not restrict benefits for any hospital stay of a covered person
in connection with childbirth for the mother or newborn child (i) following a
normal vaginal delivery to less than 48 hours or (ii) following a cesarean
section to less than 96 hours. An insurer shall not require that a provider obtain
a utilization review determination from an insurer for prescribing the length
of stay required under this subdivision.
(q) Exemptions. – This subsection shall not apply to utilization review requests that are
pending review by an insurer or its URO. An insurer may not require a provider to request a
utilization review for a healthcare service in order for the covered person to whom the healthcare
service is being provided to receive coverage for the service if, within the most recent 12-month
period, the insurer or its URO has issued certifications, or would have issued certifications, for
not less than eighty percent (80%) of the utilization review requests submitted by the provider
for that healthcare service. An insurer may evaluate whether a provider continues to qualify for
this exemption not more than once every 12 months. All of the following apply to an exemption
under this subsection:
(1) A provider is not required to request an exemption in order to qualify for the
exemption.
(2) No more than once per year per healthcare service, a provider who does not
receive an exemption under this subsection may request from the insurer
evidence to support the insurer's decision. A healthcare provider may appeal
an insurer's decision to deny the exemption.
(3) An insurer may only revoke an exemption at the end of the applicable
12-month period if the insurer does all of the following:
a. Makes a determination that the provider would not have met the eighty
percent (80%) approval criteria based on a retrospective review of the
claims for the particular service for which the exemption applies for
the previous three months or for a longer period if needed to reach a
minimum of 10 claims for review.
b. Provides the provider with the information the insurer relied upon in
making the determination to revoke the exemption.
c. Provides the provider a plain language explanation of how to appeal
the decision.
(4) If an insurer revokes an exemption, then that exemption will remain in effect
until the thirtieth calendar day after the date the insurer notifies the provider
of its revocation of the exemption unless the provider appeals the revocation.
If the provider appeals the revocation, then the exemption shall remain in
effect until the fifth calendar day after the revocation is upheld on appeal.
(5) An insurer shall provide a healthcare provider that receives an exemption all
of the following:
a. A statement that the provider qualifies for an exemption from
preauthorization requirements.
b. A list of services for which the exemption applies.
c. A statement of the duration of the exemption.
(6) An insurer shall not deny or reduce payment for a healthcare service exempted
from a utilization review requirement under this subsection, including a
healthcare service performed or supervised by another provider when the
provider who ordered the service received an exemption, unless the rendering
provider meets one of the following criteria:
a. Knowingly and materially misrepresented the healthcare service as a
part of the request for payment submitted to the insurer with the
Page 12 House Bill 434-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
specific intent to deceive and obtain an unlawful payment from the
insurer.
b. Failed to substantially perform the healthcare service.
Nothing in this subsection requires an insurer to evaluate an existing exemption or prevents
an insurer from establishing a longer exemption period.
(r) Deemed Approval. – Any failure by an insurer or its URO to comply with the
deadlines and other requirements specified in this section will result in any healthcare services
subject to review to be automatically deemed authorized by the insurer."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-500. Reports due regarding health benefit plans.
(a) Health Benefit Plan Reporting Requirements. – All insurers offering health benefits
shall be required to provide the following information to the Commissioner no later than March
1 of each year:
(1) Utilization review. – At a minimum, and subject to any rules adopted by the
Commissioner, insurers shall provide information regarding utilization review
approvals and noncertifications for the previous calendar year, reported
separately for medications and procedural codes, for all of the following:
a. The total number of medications and procedural codes subject to
utilization review, and specifically prior authorization.
b. The percentage of medications and procedural codes requiring prior
authorization.
c. The reasons for any noncertifications issued.
d. The number and percentage of utilization review determinations that
are appealed and the number and percentage of appeals that are
approved or denied at each stage of the appeal process.
e. The average time and distribution by percentile of number of days
between submission and response of each stage of the appeal process.
f. The number and percentage of providers who qualify for an exemption
from the utilization review process under this section.
(2) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(b) Commissioner Authority Over Required Information. – The Commissioner is
authorized to adopt rules related to this section. By rule, the Commissioner is authorized to
require additional information related to the subject of the required report. By rule, the
Commissioner is authorized to clarify or define further any information required under this
section to be the subject of a report.
(c) Commissioner Reporting Requirements. – No later than April 1 of each year, the
Commissioner shall compile the information received under subsection (a) of this section and
submit a report containing that compiled information to the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations.
(d) Notwithstanding the penalty limits under G.S. 58-2-70, the failure of an insurer to
provide information required under this section is a violation subject to a fine of five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per day that the information is not provided."
SECTION 1.(c) In accordance with G.S. 135-48.24(b) and G.S. 135-48.30(a)(7),
which require the State Treasurer to implement procedures that are substantially similar to the
provisions of G.S. 58-50-61 for the North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers and State
Employees (State Health Plan), the State Treasurer and the Executive Administrator of the State
Health Plan shall review all practices of the State Health Plan and all contracts with, and practices
of, any third party conducting any utilization review on behalf of the State Health Plan to ensure
compliance with subsection (a) of this section no later than the start of the next plan year.
House Bill 434-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(d) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section become effective October 1,
2025, and apply to insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.

PART II. ENFORCEMENT OF LICENSING REQUIREMENTS FOR HEALTH
INSURANCE UTILIZATION REVIEW
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 90-1.1(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) The practice of medicine or surgery. – Except as otherwise provided by this
subdivision, the practice of medicine or surgery, for purposes of this Article,
includes any of the following acts:
…
g. Performing any portion of the utilization review process under
G.S. 58-50-51 that is required under that section to be performed by a
physician licensed to practice medicine, including making a final
utilization review decision, issuing a noncertification, and
participating on behalf of an insurer in the utilization reconsideration
and appeal process.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) Part 2 of Article 50 of Chapter 58 of the General Statues is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-50-64. Utilization review disciplinary actions; North Carolina Medical Board.
(a) Performing any portion of the utilization review process under G.S. 58-50-61 that is
required to be performed by a licensed physician, including making a final utilization review
decision, issuing a noncertification, and participating on behalf of the insurer in the utilization
reconsideration and appeal process, is the practice of medicine under G.S. 90-1.1(5).
(b) The North Carolina Medical Board has the authority to subpoena an insurer, or a
utilization review organization acting on behalf of an insurer, for any records, documents, or
other materials pertaining to the involvement of any physician licensed in this State in the
utilization review process under G.S. 58-50-61.
(c) If an insurer, or a utilization review organization acting on behalf of an insurer, fails
to comply with a subpoena issued in accordance with this section, the North Carolina Medical
Board shall report the failure to comply and any information supporting the failure to the
Commissioner.
(d) Notwithstanding the penalty minimum limit under G.S. 58-2-70, the failure of an
insurer, or a utilization review organization acting on behalf of an insurer, to provide information
required by a subpoena issued in accordance with this section is a violation subjecting the insurer
to a fine of no less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each 90-day period in which the
information is not produced.
(e) If the North Carolina Medical Board takes any disciplinary action under G.S. 90-14(a)
against a licensed physician as a result of that physician's involvement in the utilization review
process under G.S. 58-50-61, then any noncertifications that were issued that are related, in whole
or in part, to the disciplinary action shall be subject to reconsideration or appeal under
G.S. 58-50-61 so long as the noncertification had not been reversed prior to the disciplinary
action. The North Carolina Medical Board shall notify the insurer of the disciplinary action and
the utilization determinations involved."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 135-48.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-48.10. Confidentiality of information and medical records; provider contracts.
(a) Any information described in this section that is in the possession of the State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees or its Claims Processor under the Plan or the Predecessor
Plan shall be confidential and shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes or any other provision requiring information and records held by State agencies to be
made public or accessible to the public. This section shall apply to all information concerning
Page 14 House Bill 434-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
individuals, including the fact of coverage or noncoverage, whether or not a claim has been filed,
medical information, whether or not a claim has been paid, and any other information or materials
concerning a plan participant, including Claim Payment Data and any documents or other
materials derived from the Claim Payment Data. This information may, however, be released to
the State Auditor or to the Auditor, the Attorney General General, or the North Carolina Medical
Board in furtherance of their the respective statutory duties and responsibilities, responsibilities
of each party or to such persons or organizations as may be designated and approved by the State
Treasurer. Any information so that is released shall remain confidential as stated above and any
as stipulated by this section. Any party obtaining such information under this section shall assume
the same level of responsibility for maintaining such confidentiality as that of the State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
(b) The terms of a contract between the Plan and its third party administrator or between
the Plan and its pharmacy benefit manager are a public record under Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes. No provision of law, however, shall be construed to prevent or restrict the release of
any information in a Plan contract to the State Treasurer, the State Auditor, the Attorney General,
the North Carolina Medical Board, the Director of the State Budget, the Plan's Board of Trustees,
and the Plan's Executive Administrator solely and exclusively for their use in the furtherance of
their duties and responsibilities.
(c) Performing any portion of the utilization review process under G.S. 58-50-61 that is
required to be performed by a licensed physician, including making a final utilization review
decision, issuing a noncertification, and participating on behalf of the insurer in the utilization
reconsideration and appeal process, is the practice of medicine under G.S. 90-1.1(5). Subject to
this section, all of the following shall apply:
(1) The North Carolina Medical Board has the authority to subpoena the Plan, or
a utilization review organization acting on behalf of the Plan, for any records,
documents, or other materials pertaining to the involvement of any physician
licensed in this State in the utilization review process under the Plan.
(2) If the North Carolina Medical Board takes any disciplinary action under
G.S. 90-14(a) against a licensed physician as a result of that physician's
involvement in the Plan's utilization review process, then any
noncertifications that were issued that are related, in whole or in part, to the
disciplinary action shall be subject to reconsideration or appeal so long as the
noncertification had not been reversed prior to the disciplinary action. The
North Carolina Medical Board shall notify the Plan of the disciplinary action
and the utilization determinations involved."

PART III. TECHNICAL AND CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 58-50-62 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) The definitions under G.S. 58-50-61(a) apply in this section."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 58-50-61(a)(7) is repealed.
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 58-50-75 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-50-75. Purpose, scope, and definitions.
…
(b) This Part applies to all insurers that offer a health benefit plan and that provide or
perform utilization review pursuant to G.S. 58-50-61, the State Health Plan for Teachers and
State Employees, G.S. 58-50-61 and any optional plans or programs operating under Part 2 of
Article 3A of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes. With respect to second-level grievance review
decisions, this Part applies only to second-level grievance review decisions involving
noncertification decisions.
(c) In addition to the The definitions in G.S. 58-50-61(a), as used in this Part:under
G.S. 58-50-61(a) and the following definitions apply in this Part:
House Bill 434-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) "Covered benefits" or "benefits" means those Covered benefits or benefits. –
Those benefits consisting of medical care, provided directly through insurance
or otherwise otherwise, and including items and services paid for as medical
care, under care under the terms of a health benefit plan.
(2) "Covered person" means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee, or other
individual covered by a health benefit plan. "Covered person" includes
another person, including the covered person's health care provider, acting on
behalf of the covered person. Nothing in this subdivision shall require the
covered person's health care provider to act on behalf of the covered person.
(3) "Independent Independent review organization" or "organization" means an
organization or organization. – An entity that conducts independent external
reviews of appeals of noncertifications and second-level grievance review
decisions."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 90-21.52(c)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) The liability of the managed care entity is based on an administrative decision
to approve or disapprove payment or reimbursement for, or denial, reduction,
or termination of coverage, for a health care service and the physician
organizations, health care providers, or entities wholly owned by physicians
or health care providers or any combination thereof, which have made the
decision at issue, have agreed explicitly, in a written addendum or agreement
separate from the managed care organization's standard professional service
agreement, to assume responsibility for making noncertification decisions
decisions, as defined under G.S. 58-50-61(13) G.S. 58-50-61, with respect to
certain insureds or enrollees; and"

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 16 House Bill 434-First Edition